Texas statutes.
PARKS AND WILDLIFE CODE

TITLE 5. WILDLIFE AND PLANT CONSERVATION

SUBTITLE A. HUNTING AND FISHING LICENSES

CHAPTER 46. FISHING LICENSES

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL FISHING LICENSE

Sec. 46.001. PROHIBITED ACTS. (a) No person may fish in the public water of this state, or unload in this state fish or other aquatic life taken for sporting purposes from waters managed by the Gulf of Mexico Fishery Management Council established under the Magnuson-Stevens Fishery Conservation and Management Act (16 U.S.C. Section 1801 et seq.), unless the person has acquired a fishing license issued under this subchapter, except as provided by Sections 46.0012 and 46.002. The commission by rule may prescribe requirements relating to possessing a license required by this subchapter.

(b) A person in a vessel on tidal water may not possess fish taken for sporting purposes unless the person holds a fishing license issued under this subchapter, except as provided by Sections 46.0012 and 46.002. In this subsection, "tidal water" has the meaning assigned by Section 47.001.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 2, Sec. 29, eff. Sept. 1, 1985; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 799, Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 1989; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 931, Sec. 49, eff. June 16, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1159 (H.B. 12), Sec. 42, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 111 (H.B. 1322), Sec. 1, eff. May 21, 2011.

Sec. 46.0011. RESIDENT AND NONRESIDENT DEFINED. (1) "Resident" means:

(A) an individual who has resided continuously in this state for more than six months immediately before applying for a fishing license required by this chapter;

(B) a member of the United States armed forces on active duty;

(C) a dependent of a member of the United States armed forces on active duty; or

(D) a member of any other category of individuals that the commission by regulation designates as residents.

(2) "Nonresident" means an individual who is not a resident.

Added by Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 1110, ch. 409, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 29, 1977. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 301, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 838, Sec. 21, eff. July 15, 1993.

Sec. 46.0012. FREE SPORTFISHING DAY. On the first Saturday in June of each year, a fishing license is not required of any person fishing for sporting purposes in public water. This section is limited to license requirements and does not affect other provisions of this code relating to the taking or possession of fish for sporting purposes.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 799, Sec. 2, eff. June 15, 1989.

Sec. 46.002. EXEMPTIONS. (a) A license issued under this chapter is not required of a person:

(1) who is a resident and whose birth date is before January 1, 1931;

(2) who is a nonresident, if the person's birth date is before September 1, 1930, and the person's state of residence grants a similar age exemption to Texas residents;

(3) with a mental illness or developmental or intellectual disability who is engaged in recreational fishing as part of medically approved therapy under the immediate supervision of personnel approved or employed by a hospital, residence, or school for persons with mental illnesses or developmental or intellectual disabilities;

(4) with a mental illness or developmental or intellectual disability who is engaged in recreational fishing under the immediate supervision of a person who:

(A) holds a license issued under this chapter; and

(B) if not a member of the family of the person with a mental illness or developmental or intellectual disability, has the permission of the family head or legal guardian of the person with a mental illness or developmental or intellectual disability to take the person with a mental illness or developmental or intellectual disability fishing;

(5) who is participating in an event that is sponsored or co-sponsored by the department with the approval of the director; or

(6) who is a resident and who is a veteran of the United States armed forces, if the person is acting under Section 11.208 and complying with rules adopted under that section.

(b) The person with a mental illness or developmental or intellectual disability who is recreationally fishing under Subsection (a)(3) shall carry an authorization identifying the entity supplying the service. This authorization may be in the form of a tag that contains the name of the sponsoring entity.

(c) A person with a mental illness or developmental or intellectual disability who is engaged in recreational fishing under Subsection (a)(4) must carry a note from a doctor stating that the person has been diagnosed with a mental illness or developmental or intellectual disability.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 27, Sec. 1, eff. April 22, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1153, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1989; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 838, Sec. 22, eff. July 15, 1993; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 629, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1058, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1274 (H.B. 550), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 182 (S.B. 700), Sec. 11, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 260 (H.B. 1728), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 46.004. LICENSE FEES. (a) The resident fishing license fee is $8 or an amount set by the commission, whichever amount is more.

(b) The commission may establish a lower fee or waive the fee or license requirement for:

(1) a resident who has a general commercial fisherman's license of this state;

(2) a resident who is blind as defined by Section 94.001, Human Resources Code;

(3) a resident or nonresident who is under 17 years old; or

(4) a resident or nonresident who is 65 years old or over.

(c) The commission shall waive the fee for a qualified veteran with a disability as defined by Section 42.012 and for a resident on active duty as a member of the United States military forces, the Texas Army National Guard, the Texas Air National Guard, or the Texas State Guard.

(d) The department may issue a lifetime resident fishing license to residents of this state. The fee for this license is $300 or an amount set by the commission, whichever amount is more.

(e) The nonresident fishing license fee is $15 or an amount set by the commission, whichever amount is more.

(f) The commission may establish collection and issuance fees for licenses and tags issued under this chapter.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 1110, ch. 409, Sec. 2, eff. Aug. 29, 1977; Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 1475, ch. 599, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977; Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 1397, ch. 623, Sec. 3, eff. Aug. 27, 1979; Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 2607, ch. 695, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1981; Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 1331, ch. 277, Sec. 19, eff. Sept. 1, 1983; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 2, Sec. 30, eff. Sept. 1, 1986; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 27, Sec. 2, eff. April 22, 1987; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 629, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 931, Sec. 80, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 840, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 145 (H.B. 1076), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 243 (H.B. 2130), Sec. 2, eff. May 25, 2007.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 182 (S.B. 700), Sec. 12, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 46.0045. TAG FEES. The commission by rule may establish fees for initial and duplicate tags issued under this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 457, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 931, Sec. 50, eff. June 16, 1995.

Sec. 46.005. TEMPORARY SPORTFISHING LICENSES. (a) Any person who is a Texas resident or other person designated by the commission is entitled to receive from the department a license allowing fishing for sporting purposes in public water for a period of 14 consecutive days or other period set by the commission. The commission may authorize the issuance of more than one type of license under this subsection and may prescribe the categories of persons to whom the licenses may be issued.

(b) The fee for a temporary sportfishing license is an amount set by the commission.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 2607, ch. 695, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1981; Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 1331, ch. 277, Sec. 20, eff. Sept. 1, 1983; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 2, Sec. 31, eff. Sept. 1, 1985; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 931, Sec. 51, eff. June 16, 1995.

Sec. 46.0051. TEMPORARY NONRESIDENT LICENSES. (a) A nonresident or other person designated by the commission is entitled to receive from the department a license allowing fishing for sporting purposes in public water for a period of five consecutive days or other period set by the commission. The commission may authorize the issuance of more than one type of license under this subsection and may prescribe the categories of persons to whom the licenses may be issued.

(b) The fee for a license is an amount set by the commission.

Added by Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 1110, ch. 409, Sec. 3, eff. Aug. 29, 1977. Amended by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 1397, ch. 623, Sec. 4, eff. Aug. 27, 1979; Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 1331, ch. 277, Sec. 21, eff. Sept. 1, 1983; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 2, Sec. 32, eff. Sept. 1, 1985; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 931, Sec. 52, eff. June 16, 1995.

Sec. 46.006. DUPLICATE LICENSE OR TAG. (a) If a license issued under this subchapter is lost or destroyed, a license deputy may issue a duplicate license on application of the license holder and receipt of $5 or an amount set by the commission, whichever amount is more. If a tag issued under this subchapter is lost or destroyed, a license deputy may issue a duplicate tag on application of the tag holder and payment of a fee set by the commission under Section 46.0045 of this code.

(b) The application for a duplicate license or tag must be an affidavit containing:

(1) a statement of fact concerning the loss or destruction of the license or tag; and

(2) any other information which the commission by regulation may prescribe as necessary.

(c) Repealed by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 931, Sec. 80, eff. June 16, 1995.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 1332, ch. 277, Sec. 22, eff. Sept. 1, 1983; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 2, Sec. 33, eff. Sept. 1, 1985; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 457, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 838, Sec. 23, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 931, Sec. 53, 80, eff. June 16, 1995.

Sec. 46.007. EXPIRATION OF LICENSES AND TAGS. (a) Except as provided by Subsections (b), (c), (d), (e), and (f) of this section, a license required or authorized by this subchapter is valid only during the yearly period for which it is issued without regard to the date on which the license is acquired. Each yearly period begins on September 1 or another date set by the commission and extends through August 31 of the next year or another date set by the commission. The commission by rule may set the amount of a license fee for a license issued during a transition period at an amount lower than prescribed in this section and provide for a license term for a transition period that is shorter or longer than a year.

(b) A license issued under Section 46.005 or 46.0051 of this code is valid for the number of consecutive days authorized and does not necessarily expire on August 31 or another date set by the commission.

(c) A tag or duplicate tag required or authorized by this subchapter is valid for a period as established by the commission.

(d) A license issued under Section 46.004 of this code that is issued before September 1 or another date set by the commission and does not expire until August 31 of the following year or another date set by the commission is valid from the date of issuance through August 31 of the following year or another date set by the commission.

(e) A lifetime resident fishing license is valid for the lifetime of the license holder.

(f) A duplicate license is valid for the period of validity of the original license only.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 1110, ch. 409, Sec. 4, eff. Aug. 29, 1977; Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 1536, ch. 626, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 29, 1977; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 457, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 838, Sec. 24, eff. July 15, 1993; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 931, Sec. 54, eff. June 16, 1995.

Sec. 46.008. LICENSE INFORMATION. A license issued under this subchapter must contain information determined by the commission to be necessary.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 1476, ch. 599, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1977; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 473, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 457, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 838, Sec. 25, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 46.0085. FORM AND ISSUANCE OF LICENSES AND TAGS. (a) The department shall issue and prescribe the form and manner of issuance of the licenses and tags authorized by this chapter. The commission by rule may prescribe identification and compliance requirements.

(b) A license and tag issued under this chapter is not valid until the person to whom it is issued completes all required information on the license and tag.

(c) The department may issue tags for finfish species allowed by law to be taken during each year or season from coastal waters of the state to holders of licenses authorizing the taking of finfish species or to other categories of persons.

(d) Rules adopted under Subsection (a) must allow for a person to present for the purpose of verification of possession a fishing license as an image displayed on a wireless communication device. The image displayed may be either an image of information from the Internet website of the department or a photograph of a fishing license.

(e) The display of an image that includes fishing license information on a wireless communication device under this section does not constitute effective consent for a law enforcement officer, or any other person, to access the contents of the wireless communication device except to view the fishing license information.

(f) The authorization of the use of a wireless communication device to display fishing license information under Subsection (d) does not prevent a court of competent jurisdiction from requiring a person to provide a paper copy of the person's fishing license in a hearing or trial or in connection with discovery proceedings.

(g) A telecommunications provider, as defined by Section 51.002, Utilities Code, may not be held liable to the holder of a fishing license for the failure of a wireless communication device to display fishing license information under Subsection (d).

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 473, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 457, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 931, Sec. 55, eff. June 16, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 41 (H.B. 547), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 46.0086. FINFISH TAGS: PROHIBITED ACTS. (a) No person may purchase or use more finfish tags during a license year than the number and type authorized for the year by the commission, excluding duplicate tags issued under Section 46.006 of this code.

(b) Except as provided by Subsection (c), no person may:

(1) use the same finfish tag on more than one finfish;

(2) use a finfish tag issued in the name of another;

(3) use a tag on a finfish for which another tag is specifically required; or

(4) take a finfish required to be tagged and fail to immediately attach a properly executed tag to the finfish in the manner prescribed by the commission.

(c) The commission by rule may modify or eliminate the requirements of this section.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 457, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 931, Sec. 56, eff. June 16, 1995.

Sec. 46.013. ISSUANCE OR ACCEPTANCE OF LICENSE. No person may issue or accept a license or tag required by this subchapter except on a form provided by the department.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 457, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 46.014. FISHING UNDER THE LICENSE OF ANOTHER. No person may fish under a license issued to another or allow another person to fish under a license issued to him.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 457, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 46.015. PENALTY. (a) A person who violates a provision of this subchapter or, except as provided by Subsection (b) of this section, who fails or refuses to show an officer his license or tag on the request of the officer commits an offense that is a Class C Parks and Wildlife Code misdemeanor.

(b) If on or before the trial of any person charged with the failure or refusal to show an officer a license or tag issued under this subchapter, the person produces for the court or the prosecuting attorney the proper fishing license or tag issued to the person and valid at the time of the offense, the court having jurisdiction of the suit shall dismiss the charge.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 810, ch. 368, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 27, 1979; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 3, Sec. 31, eff. Sept. 1, 1985; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 457, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

SUBCHAPTER B. LAKE TEXOMA FISHING LICENSE

Sec. 46.101. LAKE TEXOMA. This subchapter applies only to Lake Texoma, which is the portion of this state inundated by the water impounded by a dam across the channel of the Red River, known as Denison Dam, and any other portion of that area of land acquired by the United States for the operation of the reservoir.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Sec. 46.102. FISHING LICENSE REQUIRED. Except as provided in this subchapter, no person may catch fish in Lake Texoma unless he has acquired a license issued under this subchapter. The commission by rule may prescribe requirements relating to possessing a license required by this subchapter.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 931, Sec. 57, eff. June 16, 1995.

Sec. 46.103. EXEMPTIONS. Residents of this state engaged in fishing within the territorial boundaries of this state are not required to obtain a license issued under this subchapter.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Sec. 46.104. LICENSE: PERIOD OF VALIDITY AND FEE. (a) A Lake Texoma fishing license is valid until December 31 following its date of issuance.

(b) The fee for the license is $5.75 or an amount set by the commission, whichever amount is more.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 1400, ch. 623, Sec. 12, eff. Aug. 27, 1979; Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 1332, ch. 277, Sec. 23, eff. Sept. 1, 1983; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 2, Sec. 34, eff. Sept. 1, 1985; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 931, Sec. 58, eff. June 16, 1995.

Sec. 46.105. LAKE TEXOMA 10-DAY FISHING LICENSE. (a) A Lake Texoma 10-day fishing license is valid for 10 consecutive days including the date of issuance.

(b) The fee for the license is $1.25 or an amount set by the commission, whichever amount is more.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 2, Sec. 35, eff. Sept. 1, 1985; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 931, Sec. 59, eff. June 16, 1995.

Sec. 46.106. FORM OF LICENSE. Licenses issued under this subchapter shall be on the form prescribed by the department and must contain information necessary for enforcement of this subchapter as required by the department.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 838, Sec. 26, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 46.108. DIVISION OF FEES. The department shall keep separate and strict account of the revenue received from licenses issued under this subchapter for annual division between this state and the State of Oklahoma. The division shall be on a basis of the proportionate area of Lake Texoma lying within the territorial jurisdiction of the respective states.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Sec. 46.109. PAYMENT BY COMPTROLLER. On February 1 of each year the comptroller shall pay to the state of Oklahoma 70 percent of the revenue collected from licenses issued under this subchapter during the previous calendar year.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Sec. 46.110. PENALTY. A person who violates a provision of this subchapter commits an offense that is a Class C Parks and Wildlife Code misdemeanor.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 3, Sec. 32, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 46.111. EFFECTIVE DATE OF SUBCHAPTER. This subchapter does not become effective until:

(1) the State of Oklahoma makes provision for the sale of licenses in Oklahoma that are parallel to the licenses authorized by this subchapter;

(2) the State of Oklahoma provides for payment to this state of not less than 30 percent of all revenue collected by Oklahoma for the licenses; and

(3) the department is satisfied that this subchapter and the provisions of Oklahoma law are not in conflict and directs that this subchapter is effective.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.